Massachusetts, session 194th, S1646.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 22 of the General Laws us hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 23. The department of fire services in cooperation with the division of
occupational licensure and code enforcement officers authorized under chapter 148A, shall
collect data on written notices of code violations and fines arising from violations of, or non-
compliance with, chapter 148 or any rules or regulations issued under said chapter 148 including,
but not limited to: (i) the failure of an individual to maintain hot work training certification; (ii)
performing hot work without hot work training certification; and (iii) failure to comply with hot
work permit requirements.
of 2

The department shall develop, operate and maintain a database containing the
information required to be collected under this section. The database shall: (i) be publicly
accessible on the department's website; and (ii) allow for an automated notification system to
alert affected property owners and insurance companies.
of 2